Hawaii statutes.
[§451D-5] Filing of electronic
mail address. Every individual applying for or renewing a license as a
physician under chapter 453, osteopathic physician under chapter 453, physician
assistant under chapter 453, advanced practice registered nurse under chapter
457, or naturopathic physician under chapter 455 shall, at the time of applying
for licensure or renewal, provide the licensing authority with a current
electronic mail address in the form and manner prescribed by the licensing
authority; provided that an applicant or licensee has an established electronic
mail address. It shall be the licensee's duty to provide notice to the
licensing authority of any change of current electronic mail address within
thirty days of the change. The electronic mail addresses may be shared by the
licensing authority only with other state or federal agencies, upon request,
for purposes of public health and safety and may be used by the licensing
authority for any purpose related to the license. Nothing herein shall be construed
to modify the method by which the licensing authority provides notice of any
matter required by law to be provided to the applicant or licensee. [L 2016, c
115, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next